Washington statutes.
RCW 2.48.140

Membership fee—Inactive.

The annual membership fee for inactive members shall be the sum of two dollars, payable on or before the first day of February of each year.

[ 1955 c 34 s 1; 1933 c 94 s 10; RRS s 138-10.]